Privacy Policy
Date Last Updated: January 7, 2025
The Atlantic Monthly Group LLC and its subsidiaries (referred to throughout this policy as “The Atlantic,” “we,” and “our”) cares about your privacy and the security of your information. This policy details our practices in connection with our print, digital, and live event products and services, including The Atlantic magazine, theatlantic.com, our mobile applications, newsletters, and any other content we provide (collectively, the “Services”) as they relate to your data. It describes the kinds of personal information we may gather about you in connection with the Services, how we use that information, to whom we disclose it, and how you can manage it.
By using our Services, you accept the practices described in this Privacy Policy, including our use of cookies and similar online tools  If you do not agree to the terms of this Privacy Policy, please do not use our Services.
Our services are constantly under development, which may cause our data practices to change from time to time. We will update this policy with any changes we make, so please visit this page often to stay current. Any changes to this policy will become effective as of the date “last updated” noted above. Your continued use of our Services following the posting of changes to these terms will mean you accept those changes.
If you are located in the European Economic Area , United Kingdom, or Switzerland, please see the
Additional Information for Users in Europe and the United Kingdom
section of this policy.
If you are a resident of California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, or Virginia  please see the
Additional Information for Users in Certain U.S. Jurisdictions
section of this policy.
Table of Contents
Information Collected
How We Use Your Information
How We Share Your Information
How Long Your Information Is Stored
Privacy Choices Regarding Personalized Advertisements
Statement on No Children’s Data
Contests, Sweepstakes or Games
Contact Us
Additional Information for Users in Europe and the United Kingdom
Additional Information for Users in Certain U.S. Jurisdictions
1. Information Collected
Information You May Provide
When you use our Services, you may voluntarily provide us with certain pieces of information about yourself, including the following.
Contact Information
- When you create an account on our website or mobile app, subscribe to the magazine, register for one of our live events, or participate in one of surveys or contests we ask you for your contact information, which may include your name, email address, phone number, and physical address.
Billing Information
- When you purchase one of our products or register for certain live events we collect your billing information, which may include your name, email address, and billing address. While you may enter your credit or debit card information on an Atlantic website or mobile app, we do not have direct access to or possession of that information beyond the last four digits of your card. Instead a third-party payment processor is responsible for the processing and storing your payment information.
Demographic information
- When you register for a live event or participate in one of our surveys we may ask you to tell us more about yourself, such as your job title and level, the name of your employer, the industry in which you work, your household income, your age, your race or ethnicity, or your gender. Some of this information may be considered sensitive personal information under applicable laws. Questions inquiring about your sensitive information are always optional.
Communication Information
- We collect information about you when you communicate with us, such as by contacting our Customer Care team, including the content of the communication and any contact information you provide.
Business Information
- If you have a professional relationship with The Atlantic we may collect information such as your job title, employer’s name and contact information, and your business email address, physical address, and telephone number.
Profile Information
- When you create or use an account on our Services, we may collect information such as your username, password, photographs, interests, preferences, and any other information you choose to provide. When you link an existing account from a third-party platform, we may additionally collect information such as that account’s ID information and associated preferences.
Information Collected Automatically
We may automatically collect certain pieces of information about you when you use our Services, including the following. Much of this information is collected via cookies. Please review
Section 5
of this policy to learn more about how they function and how to turn them off.
Device Information
- This lets us know how you are accessing our Services and may include information such as the kind of device you are using, your operating system, your browser, your mobile carrier, certain device settings, referral URLs, your IP address and other unique device identifiers.
Usage Information
- This lets us know how you are interacting with our Services and may include information such as which parts of Service visit, how long you visit, your search history within our Services, and how you interacted with advertisements and emails.
Location Information
- As previously mentioned, we collect your device’s IP address when you use our Services. Your IP address may disclose or allow us to infer the general location of your device at the time you access the Services.
Inferred Information
- In order to better understand our user base, we may infer some information about you, such as your age, gender, education level, and household composition, based on your survey responses.
Information Collected from Third Parties
Other Individuals
- We may receive personal information about you from other individuals such as when someone purchases you a gift subscription to The Atlantic magazine.
Social Media and Other Third-Party Platforms
- If you interact with our pages or accounts on social media platforms (such as Facebook, Twitter, TikTok, LinkedIn, etc.), we may collect personal information about you available on that platform. This may include your social media account ID, username, user ID, profile picture, cover photo, networks to which you belong, friends, connections, and contact information  Additionally, you may choose to log-in to our Services using your account on certain social media or other third-party platforms. If you do so, we and that platform may share certain information about you and your activities. You can read more about your choices in
Section 5
of this policy.
Publicly or Commercially Available Sources
- We may obtain contact details and other personal information of media contacts and influencers from a variety of publicly or commercially available sources/databases.
Information for Media Contacts and Influencers
- We obtain contact details and other personal information regarding media contacts and influencers from a variety of sources including Cision. If you wish to know more about how such information is collected and used, please refer to
Cision’s privacy notice
.
2. How We Use Your Information
We use your information for the purposes described below.
Providing the Services
- Your personal information helps us to provide you with our Services such as giving you access to the Services, fulfilling your subscription, maintaining your account, processing your payments, providing you with customer support, and allowing you to participate in sweepstakes, contests, or other promotions.
Personalizing the Services
- Your personal information allows us to give you a customized experience with our Services including offering  you content recommendations, promotions, and advertisements that are more relevant to you.
Communicating with You
- Your personal information, such as your contact details, allows us to communicate with you in a variety of ways. We may send you The Atlantic magazine, newsletters, and updates; inform you about content, products, and promotions that may be of interest; provide you with invoices and payment reminders; send you surveys and other research material; and provide you with customer support.
Advertising
- We may use your personal information to deliver advertisements that are of interest to you, both on our own behalf and on that of third parties. We may also use this information to measure the effectiveness of a given ad campaign (for example, by measuring the number of unique viewers for that advertisement). To find out more about personalized advertising, please review
Section 5
of this policy. We may also email you on behalf of our advertisers or event underwriters to inform you about their products or services and offers that may be of interest. You can opt out of such communication at any time by emailing us at privacy@theatlantic.com or contacting our Customer Care team as detailed in
Section 8
below.
Social Media
- We may use your personal information, including information provided to us by social media or other third-party platforms to enable you to log into our Services, to connect your social media account to our Services, or to enable you to interact with our social media accounts and activity. We may also use your information to help us determine what content or advertising to deliver to you on those social media platforms.
Providing Services to our Business Customers
- We may use your information to facilitate the provision of services to business customers by our business-focused divisions, including without limitation Atlantic57 (our creative consulting division) and Re:think (our sponsored content studio).
Analytics, Research, and Development
- We may use your personal information, including information that may be considered sensitive, to learn more about who uses our Services and how they use it. This helps us to make business and marketing decisions, improve our current products and develop new ones that will be of interest to you.
Maintenance & Security
-  We may use your personal information to assist us in maintaining and securing our Services, including evaluating our security systems, debugging, detecting security incidents, preventing malicious, fraudulent, and illegal activity, enforcing our terms of service, and protecting the rights and safety of The Atlantic and others.
Compliance with Law
- We may use your personal information when we believe it is necessary to enforce our
Terms & Conditions
,
Terms of Sale
, or to comply with laws and regulations.
3. How We Share Your Information
We may share your personal information with third parties. In general, the reasons we may share your information falls into one or more of the following categories.
Affiliates
- We may share your personal information with our corporate parent, subsidiaries, and affiliates, for purposes consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Service Providers
- We may share some of your personal information with service providers who perform functions on our behalf to help us to offer our Services and manage our business. This includes:
Processing payments
Fulfilling purchase orders
Managing email communications
Providing customer service
Storing data
Building and distributing surveys
Conducting research and development
Running analytics
Serving advertisements and measuring their performance
Maintaining the safety and security of our Services
Content or Advertising Partners
- Third parties that provide content, advertising, or functionality to the Services may collect or receive information about you and/or your use of the Services, including through the use of cookies, beacons, and similar technologies (please review
Section 5
of this policy to learn more). These third parties may use your information to provide you with advertising that is based on your interests; to measure and analyze ad performance on our Services or other websites or platforms; and may combine it with information collected across different websites, online services, and other devices. These third parties’ use of your information will be based on their own privacy policies.
Event Partners and Underwriters
- When you register for or attend one of our Live events, we may share some of your registration information, such as your email address, with our event partners or underwriters. They may use this information to let you know about their products and services. We will only share your information with your permission and you can opt out at any time.
Social Media
- If you log into our Services via a social media service or if you connect a social media account with our Services, we may share information about you or your activities on that social media service, including what you view on our websites and applications, with that social media service and/or its users  Social media services will use that information based on their own privacy policies  If you do not want your information shared in this way, do not connect your social media service account with our Services, or log out of your social media service before using our Services.
For Legal Compliance or Public Interest
- We may share your personal information when we believe it is necessary to comply with the law or legal process; to protect and defend our rights or to prevent misuse of our Services; or to protect the personal safety of our employees, agents, partners, the users of the Services, or the public.
Corporate Transactions
- In the event that we sell or transfer our business, merge with another entity, or engage in another sort of corporate transaction, we may share your personal information with the acquiring entity.
At Your Direction
- We may also share your personal information with third parties when you instruct us to do so.
4. How Long Your Information Is Stored
There is no singular retention period for personal information we may hold about you. In general, we store your information for as long as needed to fulfill the purpose(s) for which we collected it. We typically keep personal information considered sensitive under applicable laws for no more than a year from the date it was collected, but may keep it (and other information) for longer when it is necessary to fulfill a legal obligation.
5. Privacy Choices Regarding Personalized Advertisements
When you visit our website or use our mobile application (our “Services”), we and our third-party partners may use online tracking technology such cookies, web beacons, SDKs, and other similar technologies to analyze your use of our Services and  your engagement with advertisements, and to serve you interest-based advertisements. The following explains cookies in greater detail and provides you with information on how to opt out of them.
Types of Online Tracking Technologies
Cookies
- Cookies are small text files stored in your device’s browser when you visit a website. They make it possible to recognize you as the same user across one or more browsing sessions, and across one or more websites  We and our partners use cookies for a variety of purposes, including remembering your sign-in credentials and preferences so that you do not have to input them each time you use the Services; allowing us and third parties to customize your experience using the Services, including by determining the most relevant content and advertisements to show you on our websites and elsewhere online; and allowing us and third parties to monitor site traffic and performance, so that we may improve our Services and your experience. For more information on cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
.
Web Beacons
- Web beacons (also called “web tags” or “pixels”) are tiny graphics or scripts that communicate information from your device to a server  Beacons can be embedded in online or mobile content, videos, advertisements, or emails  They allow a server to read certain types of information from your device, such as when you viewed content that contains a beacon and the IP address of the device on which you viewed it. We and third parties use beacons for a variety of purposes, including to analyze the use of our Services and to provide content and ads that are more relevant to you.
SDKs
- SDKs are third-party computer code that we may incorporate into our mobile applications that can be used for a variety of purposes, including to provide us with analytics regarding the use of our mobile applications, to integrate with social media, to add features or functionality to our app, or to facilitate online advertising.
How to Opt Out
There are a number of ways to opt out of having your online activity and device data collected by third parties, which we have summarized below. We hope you find this information to be a helpful reference. Please note that using these tools to opt out of tracking and targeting does not mean that you will receive no advertising while using our Services. Instead, you will cease receiving advertisements tailored to your interests.
On Your Browser
Changing your browser settings
- Most web browsers automatically accept cookies by default, but typically allow you to change your settings to disable or reject them. You can usually find these settings in the Options or Preferences menu of your browser; links to instructions provided by several of the most common browsers are below. You can also learn more at
www.allaboutcookies.org
. Note, however, that if you reject or disable cookies, some features of our Services may not work or may not work as designed.
Cookie settings in Google Chrome
Cookie settings in Firefox
Cookie settings in Microsoft Edge
Cookie settings in Safari web and iOS
Using Privacy Plug-ins or Browsers
- You can block our websites from setting cookies used for interest-based ads by using a browser with default privacy features, like Brave, or installing browser plugins like Privacy Badger, Ghostery or uBlock Origin, and configuring them to block third party cookies/trackers.
Advertising Industry Opt Out Tools
Many of the third party advertisers that use tracking or targeting tools in connection with our Services offer you additional choices regarding the collection and use of your information  You can learn more about the options available to limit these participating third parties advertisers’ collection and use of your information by visiting their websites:
On Your Browser:
Opt Out of Interest Based Advertising (National Advertising Initiative)
Your Ad Choices (Digital Advertising Alliance)
Your Online Choices (European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance)
On Your Mobile Device:
Mobile app users may opt out of receiving targeted advertising from participating members of the Digital Advertising Alliance by installing the AppChoices mobile app,
available here
, and selecting the user’s choices
Platform-Specific Opt Outs
If you choose to connect to our Services via a third-party platform or social media network, you may have the ability to limit the information that we obtain from the third-party, either at the time you login to our Services or subsequently via your settings on the third-party platform or network. Additionally, some third-party platforms or social media networks have features that allow you to opt-out of interest based advertising. Below are links to further information on platforms that integrate with our Services.
Facebook
-
About Facebook Ads
and
Facebook Privacy Policy
Google
- Our Services may deliver advertising using the vendor DoubleClick, a Google company. You can read
about how DoubleClick uses cookies
, use Google’s
controls for blocking certain ads
, or use Google’s
ad settings page
to control how DoubleClick personalizes your ad experience  The Services also may use Google Analytics to track your usage, including the stitching of authenticated and unauthenticated sessions (which allows for the combination of data from your use of the Services while not signed in to your Atlantic account with your use of the Services while signed in to your Atlantic account). If you wish to opt-out of Google Analytics’ tracking, use this
browser add-on
provided by Google.
On Your Mobile Device
Block Advertising ID
-  Your mobile device settings may permit you to limit use of the advertising ID associated with your mobile device for interest-based advertising purposes.
Opt-Out via Advertising Networks
- You can learn about your options to opt-out of mobile app tracking by certain advertising networks through your device settings. For more information about how to change these settings visit the links below:
Apple Devices
Android Devices
Microsoft Devices
6. Statement on No Children’s Data
The Services are not intended for children under 13 years of age. We do not knowingly collect information from children under 13 (under 16 for those located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland) and we do not target the Services to such children. If you are under 13 years of age, or if you are under 16 years of age and are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, do not provide personal information to The Atlantic without providing us with consent from your parents. If we discover that any child under the age of 13 or a child from the EEA, UK, or Switzerland under the age of 16 has provided us with personal information and we do not have parental consent, we will delete that child’s information as soon as reasonably practicable. If you believe that we have been provided with the personal information of a child from the EEA, UK, or Switzerland under the age of 16 without parental consent, or have been provided with the personal information of any child under the age of 13 without parental consent, please notify us immediately at privacy@theatlantic.com.
7. Contests, Sweepstakes or Games
When we run a contest, sweepstakes, or game relating to the Services, it will be accompanied by a set of rules. The rules for each contest, sweepstakes or game will specify how the information gathered from you for entry will be used and disclosed if it is different than as described in this Privacy Policy. In conjunction with your entry in such contests or sweepstakes, personal information will be collected only if you voluntarily submit it.
8. Contact Us
If you have an account with www.theatlantic.com, you may review and change your information by logging into your account and editing your account profile.
If you have questions about our Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
ATTN: General Counsel
The Atlantic Monthly Group LLC
610 Water Street, SW
Washington, DC 20024
Phone: +1 (202) 266-7000
Email: privacy@theatlantic.com
If you have questions about subscriptions to The Atlantic, please contact us at:
Atlantic Customer Care
PO Box 37564
Boone, IA 50037-0564
Phone: +1 (855) 940-0585
Email: support@theatlantic.com
9. Additional Information for Users in Europe and the United Kingdom
The following information is provided for and applies to those located in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom, in accordance with the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) and other similar laws.
Legal Bases for Processing
We process your personal data consistent with the ways described previously in this policy. When we do, we rely on one or more “legal bases” to do so. The legal bases we rely on are:
With your consent, such as when you accept cookies;
To perform our agreement to provide you with Services, such as to maintain your account or to fulfill your subscription; or
For our “legitimate interests,” such as maintaining the security of Services, preventing fraud, or marketing. We only engage in legitimate interest-based processing where it has little to no impact on your data privacy-related fundamental rights and freedoms.
International Data Transfers
We may store your personal information on servers located outside of Europe or the United Kingdom, including on servers based in the United States. When you access our Services from Europe or the United Kingdom, your personal data may be subject to an “international data transfer” as defined in the European Data Privacy Laws. In order to protect the security of your information when making such transfers, we rely on the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses and/or the United Kingdom’s International Data Transfer Agreement/Addendum depending on the source of the data and the specific circumstances of the transfer.
Your Rights and How to Exercise Them
You have certain rights related to our processing and retention of your personal information, which are described below. To exercise these rights, please visit our
Help Center
or contact us at privacy@theatlantic.com and include as complete a description of the request as possible.
Access
- This Privacy Policy describes the personal information we collect and how we use and disclose it. If you would also like to know the specific pieces of personal information we hold about you, we will provide you with a copy upon your request.
Correction
- If you believe that any of the personal information we hold about you is inaccurate you may request that we correct it. You can update some information, like your contact details, yourself by visiting your account page. For other corrections, please contact  us as described above.
Deletion
- You may request that we delete the personal information we hold about you. Please note that we may need to retain limited amounts of personal information after completing your request for legal compliance purposes.
Objection/Restriction/Withdrawal of Consent
- You may object to, restrict, and/or withdraw your consent to our processing of your personal information if you believe our processing (i) uses inaccurate information; (ii) is unlawful; or (iii) when our processing is based on your consent or our legitimate interests. You may also opt out of receiving marketing communications from us. You may do so by (i) following the unsubscribe link in the footer of any email you receive from us; (ii) altering your communication settings on your account page; or (iii) emailing us as described in the
Section 8
of this policy above. If you are withdrawing consent to our processing of special categories of data, you may alternatively fill out our Limit the Use of My Sensitive Personal Information form on our
data opt-out page
.
Right to Lodge a Complaint
If you believe that we have processed your personal information in violation of a European Data Privacy Law, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority in your country of residence. You can find a list of supervisory authorities and their contact information on this
website
.
10. Additional Information for Users in Certain U.S. Jurisdictions
This section only applies to residents of California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, and Virginia. Residents of these U.S. states are afforded additional rights in accordance with their respective state data privacy laws. It describes how we collect, use, and share personal information in operating our business as well as your individual rights with respect to your personal information.
How We Collect, Use, and Share your Personal Information
We may collect the following categories of personal information about you:
Identifiers
(e.g., device identifier, IP address, unique browser ID, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, account login, other unique identifiers, name, site log-in, email address, mailing address (or state / province and country of residence), phone number, images of yourself you provide us for your account page you are creating and completing in order to attend an event we are hosting.
Commercial information
(e.g., subscription records, site engagement).
Internet or network information
(e.g., browsing and search history, site and advertisement interactions, audience research data).
Geolocation data
(e.g., location derived from GPS-enabled services).
Professional and employment-related information
(e.g., your job title, income level, and the name of your employer.
Financial information
(e.g.,  your financial account numbers or payment card information; please note that a third party payment processor is responsible for all collection, processing, and storage of your Financial Information and we do not have direct access to or possession of any payment card information.)
Education information
(e.g., highest level of education attained).
Protected classification characteristics
(e.g., age and gender)
Inferences
(e.g., information about your interests, preferences, and favorites).
The sources from which we collect information and additional details on the information we collect are described in
Section 1
of this policy; the business and commercial purposes for which we collect this information are described in
Section 2
of this policy; and the ways in which we may share this information are described in
Section 3
of this policy.
Your Privacy Rights and How to Exercise Them
As a California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, or Virginia resident, you have certain rights related to your personal information, which are detailed below. We encourage you to invoke these rights if you wish. Rest assured that we will not discriminate or retaliate against you for doing so.
Except where otherwise noted, you can exercise these rights by visiting our
Help Center
or by contacting us at privacy@theatlantic.com. If you opt to email us, please include as detailed a description of your request as possible.
Upon receiving certain types of requests, we may ask you to verify your identity before we can move forward. Typically this will involve asking you to confirm information we already have on file about you. We will never ask you for sensitive information such as your credit card, driver’s license, or social security numbers for verification purposes.
You may also allow an “authorized agent” to submit a request on your behalf through the same means outlined above. Unless your agent has been given power of attorney, we will additionally need the following items to honor your request:  (1) written authorization, signed by you, allowing them to act on your behalf; (2) proof of your identity; and (3) direct confirmation sent from you to us (without the authorized agent as an intermediary) affirming that the agent is authorized to act on your behalf.
Types of Rights
Access
This policy describes the categories of personal information we may collect about you, and how that information is collected, used, and disclosed. We will also provide you with the specific pieces of personal information we hold about you upon your request. Oregon residents may also request to know the specific third parties to whom your personal information has been disclosed.
Correction
If you believe that any of the personal information we hold about you is inaccurate you may request that we correct it. You can update some information, like your contact details, yourself by visiting your account page. For other corrections, please contact  us as described above.
Deletion
You may request that we delete the personal information we hold about you. We fulfill these requests by erasing the data or by anonymizing it such that you can no longer be identified. We will not attempt to re-identify anonymized data. Please note that we may need to retain limited amounts of personal information after completing your request for legal compliance purposes. Additionally, we may postpone completion of your request when your personal information is necessary to fulfill our obligations to you. For example, if you are an active subscriber we may wait until your subscription expires before fulfilling your request.
Right to Withdraw Consent for or Limit the Use and Disclosure of Your Sensitive Personal Information
When you participate in one of our surveys, we may ask you about information that could be considered sensitive under applicable privacy laws. The question will always be optional, but you also have the option to withdraw your consent to our use of this information or to limit our right to use or disclose your sensitive personal information after you’ve provided it to us. If you do so, we will delete it entirely; only use it as necessary to provide our Services to you; or as otherwise permitted by law. To opt-out, you can visit our
data opt-out page
or email us at privacy@theatlantic.com.
Opt out of “Selling,”Sharing, or Using for Targeted Advertising
Y
ou have the right to opt out of the “sale” of your personal information, or the sharing/use of it for targeted advertising. Under some of these state laws, the word “sale” means our disclosure of your personal information to a third party in exchange for money or any other thing of value, while others only consider it a “sale” if money was exchanged. For the purposes of this policy, when we say “sale,” “selling,” or “sold,” we mean in the broader sense: the exchange of personal information for money or any other thing of value. However, “selling” does not encompass disclosing your personal information to a third party for other purposes, such as those that enable us to provide our Services. We do not sell your personal information in the conventional sense (i.e.,  for money), but may disclose certain details to our business partners and underwriters.
Sharing or using your personal information for targeted advertising means our disclosure of your personal information to a third party in order to serve you interest-based advertisements. Likewise, it does not encompass disclosing your personal information to a third party for other purposes.
To opt out of one or both of these practices, please visit
our data opt-out page
. You may also opt out by enabling a legally-recognized, opt-out preference signal (such as the Global Privacy Control) on your device. Please review
Section 5
above for more information on how to enable these signals. We recognize the signal on an account level, so your opt out request will be applied across your devices as long as you are logged into your Atlantic account. Please note that after opting out you will continue to see non-targeted advertisements on our Services.
Additionally, when residents of California opt out of “sales,” we also treat your request as one made pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law to opt out of  the disclosure of your personal information to third parties for their use for direct marketing.
If your request related to any of the rights detailed above  is denied, you may appeal that decision by emailing us at privacy@theatlantic.com.
Information We Disclose To Third Parties
The chart below details the categories of (1) personal data we disclose to third parties, (2) third parties we disclose that information to for a business purpose, and (3) third parties we “sell” or share it with for targeted advertising. It reflects these practices over the 12 months prior to the day this policy was last updated. As a reminder, our service providers enable us to deliver our Services to you. For example, we use service providers to process your payments, to manage our email communications with you, and to maintain our Services’ safety and security. Please note that the lists below are likely to be overbroad for any single person. Similarly, not every data point that falls into the categories below is necessarily shared with all of the third parties listed. For more information on the categories used in the following chart and the reasons why we share personal data, please review
Section 1
and
Section 3
of this policy, respectively.
Category of Personal Data
Third Parties to Whom it May Be Disclosed for a Business Purpose
Third Parties to Whom it May Be Sold or Shared/Used for Targeted Advertising
Identifiers
(e.g, name, email address, postal address, other contact information, IP address, online identifiers)
Service Providers, Business Partners
Underwriters, Business Partners, Advertisers
Demographic Information
(e.g, age or gender)
Service Providers
Commercial Information
(e.g, purchase history)
Service Providers, Business Partners
Business Partners, Advertisers
Payment Information
(as needed to fulfill your purchase orders)
Service Providers
Internet or Network Information
(e.g, browsing history on our Services and interactions with our Services)
Service Providers, Business Partners
Business Partners, Advertisers
Geolocation Data
(inferred from your IP address)
Service Providers, Business Partners
Business Partners, Advertisers
Professional and Employment-Related Information
(e.g, your job level and industry)
Service Providers
Underwriters
Inferences
(e.g, inferences about your location and preferences)
Service Providers, Business Partners
Business Partners, Advertisers
Sensitive Personal Information
(e.g. race or ethnicity)
Service Providers
Additional Information for California Residents
The following information applies to California residents only.
Notice Regarding Financial Incentives for California Residents
- From time to time, we may offer the opportunity to participate in user research surveys, which may be emailed to you directly or publicized on our social media accounts. As a part of these surveys we may collect Personal Information, including but not limited to demographic information and information about your experiences with our Services. We use this information to help us gain further insight into and to improve our Services. In some instances, participation in a survey may make you eligible to win prizes, e.g, gift cards, in a sweepstakes. Under California law, this may be considered a financial incentive in exchange for Personal Information. We may also occasionally contact you about other opportunities to earn gifts or prizes from us. These too may be considered a financial incentive in exchange for Personal Information under California law. The value of a given gift or prize is reasonably related to the value of the information provided. We assess the value of your Personal Information by considering, without limitation, details such as the cost to us of providing you with the gift or prize, the potential revenue or improvements to the Services made possible by the direct or indirect use of the information.
Participation in any survey is voluntary. You may opt out of receiving surveys from us by emailing research@theatlantic.com. For more information regarding a sweepstakes linked to a particular survey, please refer to that sweepstakes’ official rules.
Notice Regarding California Residents We Know to Be Under the Age of 16
- California residents we know to be younger than 16 years of age will by default be treated as though they have exercised a request to opt out of the sale or sharing of their personal information with respect to information provided directly to us (as opposed to information automatically collected from them through technical means). We do not permit such users to opt-in to the sale or sharing of their Personal Information, unless they provide proof that they are no longer under the age of 16. To do so, please email us at privacy@theatlantic.com.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://www.cision.com/us/legal/privacy-policy:
___
Skip Navigation
Accessibility Statement
French Translation
About Cision
Cision is a global media intelligence group of companies that enables its customers to understand, influence and amplify their stories.
To do this we enable customers to identify and connect with journalists, influencers and online authors to listen and understand what is being said about their brands, distribute meaningful public relations, corporate and marketing communications and measure the impact of those communications.
In this policy, when we refer to "Cision", “we” and “us,” we mean Cision US Inc. but our products and services operate under a number of different brands, including Cision, Brandwatch, PR Newswire and Bulletin.
For the purposes of Data Privacy law, the below relates to when Cision is deciding the purpose and means of processing personal data.
Introduction to our Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy and our related Privacy Notices (see below) describe how we collect, use, protect and share information about you that we obtain when you are part of our products and services, use our services, our websites or otherwise interact with us.
Please click on the sections below to learn more about our Privacy posture:
HOW THIS POLICY WORKS WITH OUR OTHER PRIVACY NOTICES AND POLICIES
HOW WE COLLECT INFORMATION FROM YOU
HOW YOUR INFORMATION MAY BE USED
HOW YOUR INFORMATION MAY BE SHARED
COOKIES & OTHER TRACKING MECHANISMS
DO NOT TRACK DISCLOSURE
YOUR COOKIE & OTHER TRACKING CHOICES
SECURING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
CHILDREN
INFORMATION COLLECTION
TRANSFERS OF PERSONAL INFORMATION OUTSIDE THE EEA
LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING
YOUR DATA SUBJECT RIGHTS
CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA CONSUMERS
How this policy works with our other privacy notices and policies
This Policy should be read together with our below related Privacy Notices, depending on how you interact with us, we will collect and process your personal information as follows:
If you are an
journalist, influencer or other media contact
in our Cision media outreach databases.
We will collect and process your contact information and media profile in accordance with our
Data Privacy Notice – Journalist, Influencers and Other Media Contacts
.
If you are an Author,
influencer, media contact or individual
active on social media, your data may be being processed by our Brandwatch service.
We will collect and process your personal data in accordance with our
Author Privacy Statement.
If you are a
customer
of any of our services.
We will collect and process your individual contact information and other personal
data in accordance with our
Cision Customer Privacy Notice
our
Brandwatch User Privacy Statement
any other agreement that we may have with your business.
If you have any
Data Privacy questions
about
Cision
You can visit the
Cision Data Privacy
information pages
If you have any
Data Privacy questions
about
Brandwatch
You can visit the
Brandwatch Data Privacy
information pages
If you
visit or register with any of our websites
(other than as a Customer or Influencer).
We will collect and use your personal information in accordance with this Privacy Policy. In particular, we may see how you use our websites and what content you interact with and for how long.  This may involve the use of cookies which is explained in our
Cookie Policy
.
If you are a
supplier
and you or your company provides us with goods or services.
We may collect your individual contact information in order to communicate with you and may use other information that we need in order to manage our account with your business.  We will process such data in accordance with this Privacy Policy and any other agreement that we may have with you.
If you are
invited to or attend one or our events
We will collect and process your contact information and any other information we may need to manage our invitation and your attendance (including for example dietary or special access requirements) in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
If you
apply for a job
with us
We will process your personal information in accordance with our
Candidate Privacy Notice
which will be sent to you when you apply.
If you are
employed
by us
We will process your personal information in accordance with our
Employee Privacy Notice
which will be provided to you when you join our staff.
Relevant
third-party
terms
YouTube
Google
Cision's use and transfer to any other app of information received from Google APIs will adhere to
Google API Services User Data Policy
including the Limited Use requirements
How We Collect Information from You
Information You Provide to Us
We collect information that you provide directly to us, including when you register for or order a Service; when a company, organization or individual authorizes you to manage its account or use our Services on its behalf; and/or when you subscribe to a newsletter, provide feedback about our Services or contact us with questions or comments about a Service.
Information We Collect Through Your Use of our Services
We collect certain technical information using cookies and other tracking mechanisms to help us operate and provide our Services to you. This information includes, without limitation:
Information about the systems and device(s) you use to access our Services, including MAC address, IP address, browser type and version, time zone setting, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform, device type, and device identifiers;
Information about your visits to the Websites, including the full URL clickstream to, through and from the Websites (including date and time);
Information about your use of our mobile apps, including the information you view in our mobile apps and the date and time you view it;
Information to facilitate your use of our Services (including to provide access to third-party websites and services), such as URL requests, destination IP addresses, or device configuration details; and
Pages you view or search for, page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs), your engagement with certain variable/dynamic elements of a page and methods used to browse away from the page.
If you decline to have us collect such information (for example, by disabling cookies; see
Cookies & Other Tracking Mechanisms
below), we may not be able to provide some or all of our Services to you.
Information We Collect about You from Third Parties
Our Services may also, from time to time, contain links to and from social media platforms. You may choose to connect with us through a social media platform and when you do, and to the extent available, we may collect additional information from you, such as your user names, profile picture, contact information, contact list, and the profile pictures of your contacts, through the social media platform.
Please be advised that social media platforms may also collect information from you. We do not have control over the collection, use and sharing practices of social media platforms and encourage you to review their usage and disclosure policies and practices, including the data security practices, before using the social media platforms.
We may combine the information we collect about you from the various sources described above.
How Your Information May Be Used
We may use any information we collect, including personal information and technical information, as described to you at the time of collection, for the following purposes:
Providing, maintaining and improving our Services.
Operating and improving our Services (
e.g.
, administration, troubleshooting, managing account access, protecting security); evaluating our Services; developing new features, products, or services; and for other customer service and support purposes.
Tailoring content.
Personalizing the information and content we display to you, including marketing, promotional and sponsored content and advertising within the Services.
Marketing and communications.
Contacting you directly about your use of an account or Service for which you are registered; providing you with information about products or services, from us or third parties that may interest you; serving advertisements to you; and responding to your requests, feedback or questions.
Research and analytics.
Researching and analyzing how you interact with our Services, including to monitor usage and activity trends and for statistical purposes; creating reports for customers that may include both aggregate trends and the organizations that are viewing their releases, or accessing our Services or customer websites or otherwise using our Services; and measuring or understanding the effectiveness of content, communications, Website visits, web traffic, our Services, or advertising we or our customers serve to you and other customers like you, and to deliver relevant advertising to you and other customers like you.
Legal compliance.
Complying with laws, regulations and requests from law enforcement or other governmental entities; carrying out our obligations and enforce our rights arising from any contracts; and using as evidence in litigation.
Protecting rights and interests.
Protecting the safety, rights or property of Cision or any third party; investigating, preventing or otherwise addressing activity that Cision, in its sole discretion, may consider to be or pose a risk of being, an illegal, unethical, or legally questionable activity.
We may also create aggregate or anonymous information about your and other users’ use of our Services for purposes similar to those listed above.
How Your Information May Be Shared
We may share any information, including personal information as follows:
With our subsidiaries and affiliates, including any future subsidiaries or affiliates;
With our service providers and sub-contractors to the extent reasonably necessary to enable us provide our Services (
e.g.
, we use a third-party platform for e-mail and cannot communicate with you without disclosing your e-mail address to our third-party e-mail provider);
With a buyer or other successor in the event of a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution or other sale or transfer of any of our assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation or similar proceeding, including during planning or negotiations of such sale or transfer;
With a third party with whom we must legally share information about you;
With the company or organization you represent upon their request;
With you or other third parties with your express consent;
To comply with any court order, valid subpoena, law or legal process, including to respond to any government or regulatory request;
To investigate potential unauthorized access or misuse of our Services or otherwise enforce or apply our Terms of Use and other agreements;
To protect our assets or rights, including for billing and collection purposes;
If we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to protect the rights, property, or safety of Cision, our customers or others, including exchanging information with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction; and
With any other entity disclosed by us when you provide the information.
We may also share aggregate or anonymous data for marketing, advertising, research, compliance, or other purposes.
In the event that we receive a request from a governmental entity to provide it with your personal information, we will take reasonable attempts to notify you of such request, to the extent reasonably possible and legally permissible.
Cookies & Other Tracking Mechanisms
We may use cookies, beacons and similar technologies, now or in the future, to support the functionality or track usage of our Services. This provides a better experience when you use our Services and allows us to improve our Services. For more information please see our
Cookie Policy
To choose your settings, please see our
Cookie Settings
Securing Your Personal Information
The security of your information is important to Cision, and we have implemented administrative, technical, and physical safeguards designed to protect personal information against theft or misuse. Unfortunately, no system can guarantee complete security of your information. As a result, while we strive to protect your personal information from unauthorized third parties, Cision cannot ensure or warrant the security of such information. Thus, your use of the Services and communications with us is at your own risk. You are responsible for protecting your username(s) and password(s) and for the security of information that you transmit to us over the internet.
Children
Our Services are directed to working professionals. Our Services are not intended for children under 16 years of age or the relevant age of majority, and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children under that age. If you are under 13 years of age or the age of majority, you are not permitted to submit any personal information to us.
Third-Party Information Collection
Our Services may contain links to third-party websites and services, including those of social media platforms, partner networks and advertisers. Please note that these websites and services may have their own privacy policies. We do not accept any responsibility or liability for the policies of any third parties. If you chose to access any websites or services linked from our Services, please check the applicable policies before you use or submit any personal information to such website or service.
Third parties unaffiliated with us may also collect information about you, including tracking your browsing history, when you use our Services. We do not have control over these third-party collection practices and advise you to adjust the settings of your browsers or install plug-ins and add-ins if you wish to minimize these third party collections.
Personal Information Transferred from EEA, UK and/or Switzerland
We may share your personal data with entities within the Cision Group. Given that we are an international organisation with our headquarters in the USA, this may involve transferring your personal data outside of the European Economic Area (“EEA”). Some of the third parties to whom we transfer your personal data are also based outside of the EEA, so their processing of your personal data will likewise involve a transfer outside the EEA. Where your personal data is transferred outside of the EEA we will ensure that we appropriate mechanisms in place to ensure the protection of your personal information, including the use of specific contracts approved by the European Commission giving your personal data the same protection as it has in Europe.
Such transfers may be made by or to us in our capacity as a data processor or as a data controller:
Processor
: Cision is a provider of software, services and tools intended to help customers manage all aspects of their marketing and PR campaigns. Cision does not own or control any of the information it processes on behalf of its customer. All such information is owned and controlled by Cision’s customer. In this capacity, Cision receives information transferred from the EU to the US merely as a processor on behalf of its customer, although such information may not be required by Cision.
Data Controller
: Cision also provides information products designed to help customers research and plan their campaigns more effectively. In this function, Cision acts as a data controller of the personal information contained in these products and processes this personal information as a data controller.
Further details of transfers of personal data outside the EEA are provided in our
International Data Transfers
page.
Legal Basis for Processing
We will only use your personal data when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal data in the following circumstances:
·        Where we need to process your information to perform the contract we are about to enter into or have entered into with you.
·        Where we need to process your information to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation.
·        Where it is in our legitimate interests to do so.  Our legitimate interests include our legitimate commercial interests in operating the Cision Services and providing you with access to our Media Database. We make sure that we consider and balance any potential negative impact on you and your rights before we process your personal data for our legitimate interests. We do not use your personal data for activities where our interests are overridden by the impact on you.
·        Where we have obtained your consent.
Your rights
You have certain rights under data protection laws which include the right to:
Access your personal information (via what is commonly known as a "data subject access request").
Require us to correct any mistakes in your information which we hold.
Require the erasure of personal information concerning you in certain situations by submitting a Data Subject Request.
Receive the personal information concerning you which you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and have the right to transmit those data to a third party in certain situations.
Object at any time to processing of personal information concerning you for direct marketing.
Object to decisions being taken by automated means (including profiling) which produce legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affect you.
Object in certain other situations to our continued processing of your personal information.
Otherwise restrict our processing of your personal information in certain circumstances.
Please click here to
Submit a Data Subject Request
or
Contact us: Privacy@cision.com
You also have the right to make a complaint to your local data protection authority at any time. We hope that we would be able to resolve any concerns that you may have before you approach your data protection authority so please do contact us in the first instance.
How long will we use your personal data?
We will keep your personal data only for as long as is necessary for the purposes set out in this privacy notice and to fulfil our legal obligations. We will not keep more data than we need.
Additional Information for California Consumers
To listen to the Audio version of this page please
download the file
.
Under the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), we are required to notify California consumers about our collection, use, and disclosure of their personal information (whether collected through this website or offline). Please see more information about this
here
.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time to align with changes to our business practices and/or changes to our legal requirements. We will post the updated Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate that the updates have been made by changing the effective date first written above. We urge you to check back periodically to see whether there have been updates to our Privacy Policy.
Your continued use of the Services or communication with us about the Services after the updated Privacy Policy has been posted (or any other indication of your consent) will constitute your acceptance of the updated Privacy Policy.
Please note that we may condition your continued access to our Services on your consent to changes to this Privacy Policy.
Contact
If you have questions, comments or requests relating to this Privacy Policy, or wish to opt out of any usage of your information as described herein, please e-mail us at
privacy@cision.com
or write to us at:
Cision US, Inc.
Legal & Privacy Dept.
300 S Riverside Plaza
Suite 300.
Chicago,
IL 60606
LAST UPDATED ON APRIL 11, 2024
We value your privacy
We use cookies to personalize content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyse our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners.
Cookie Policy
.
Accept All
Reject
Manage Preferences
Sub-policy 1
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024
|
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies